Maryland, session 2025, HB1512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–201.
(a) (1) This section does not apply to Baltimore City.
(2) Subsections (b), (c), (d), and (f) of this section do not apply in Prince
George’s County.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1512*

HOUSE BILL 1512
(b) (1) The term of a county superintendent is 4 years beginning on July 1. A
county superintendent continues to serve until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(2) [By February 1 of the year in which a term ends, the county
superintendent shall notify the county board whether the superintendent is a candidate for
reappointment.
(3)] (I) [In] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
IN the year in which [a] AN INITIAL term begins, the county board shall appoint a county
superintendent between February 1 and June 30. [However, if the county board decides to
reappoint the incumbent superintendent, the county board shall take final action at a
public meeting no later than March 1 of that year.]
(II) AT ANY POINT DURING THE INCUMBENT
SUPERINTENDENT’S TERM, THE COUNTY BOARD MAY TAKE ACTION AT A PUBLIC
MEETING NOT LATER THAN MARCH 1 OF THE YEAR IN WHICH THE CONTRACT IS
BEING RENEWED TO REAPPOINT THE INCUMBENT SUPERINTENDENT TO SERVE A
NEW TERM OF 4 YEARS BEGINNING THE IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING JULY 1.
[(4)] (3) If a county board is unable to appoint a county superintendent
by July 1 of a year in which a term begins, the provisions of subsection (d) of this section
apply.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.